dictionaries/fa_IR/fa_IR.dic
اخفا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
اخمو/z2b3y4j1j3t1
اشکوب/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
افلاکی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
الاهه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
البرادعی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
التصاقی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
التفات/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
امر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
امپرسیونیستی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
امیرفضلی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
انباردار/z1b1y1j1j3t1
انداخت/e1e2e3e4sgzg
اندای/e1e2e3e4shzh
اندوختن/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
انوشا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
اهورامزدا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
اپسیلون/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
اکراه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
ایر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1
ایلنا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
باب/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
باریده/e1e2sn
باهویت/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
بتاخت/sg
بتراش/sh
بدگمان/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
برافشان/e1e2e3e4shzh
برافشاند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
برج/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
برست/sg
برمی‌افشانده/e1e2sn
برمی‌دم/sh
برمی‌گردیده/e1e2sn
برنزه/z3b2y2j2j4t2
برگشود/e1e2e3e4sgzg
بشنو/sh
بلاگردان/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
بندیخانه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
بنیادگری/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
بپالود/sg
بکار/sh
بیابانگرد/z1b1y1j1j3t1
بیالود/sg
بیله/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
تاثیر‌گذاری/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
تام/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
تجریش/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
تخصص/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
ترشانده/e1e2sn
تسهیل/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
تندآب/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
توسن/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
تکاپوگری/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
تکلم/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
تکنو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1an
جمهوریخواه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
جنگجو/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
جویا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
جوید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
جیوه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
حایزاهمیت/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
حجج/z1b1y1
حقیر/z1b1y1j1j3t1
حکیمیه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
خبرنگار/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
خداوارگی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
خراش/e1e2e3e4shzh
خسب/e1e2e3e4shzh
خلل/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
خوابیده/e1e2sn
خواست/e1e2e3e4sgzg
خودمدارانه/z3b2y2j2j4t2
خور/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
خیزش/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
دبلیوبوش/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
درازنفسی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
دربستی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
درنمی‌آمیخت/sg
دنبلان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
دهه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
دیجیتال/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
دیرپایی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
ذوالقدر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1
راستگرایانه/z3b2y2j2j4t2
راکعیان/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
رزمجو/z2b3y4j1j3t1
رشت/e1e2e3e4sgzg
رشت/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
رقصاند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
رنگ/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
رهید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
روتین/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
روسیو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1
زدای/e1e2e3e4shzh
زرگر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
سالارنیا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
ساوانا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
ساینده/z3b2y2j2j4t2
ستد/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
سنجید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
سهمناکی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
سگال/e1e2e3e4shzh
سیبکی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
سیسه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
سیندرلا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
شاپرک/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
شتابیدن/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
شجاع/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
شدت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
شمشیرباز/z1b1y1j1j3t1
شناخته/e1e2sn
شوراند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
شیلات/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
صایب/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
صحابه/z3b2hzy2
ضربه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
عصرگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
عضو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1an
غفلت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
فاحشه/z3b2y2j2j4t2
فاطمه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
فانوسقه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
فراقانونی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
فروآی/e1e2e3e4shzh
فرک/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
قاطعیت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
قرص/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
قضیه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
قفا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
قلعکار/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
قلمزنی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
قمصر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1
لامپا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
لغزان/e1e2e3e4shzh
لندن/z1b1z4j2j4j6y1
لیر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1
مجد/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1
مجهول/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
محمودزاده/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
مذبح/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
مستهلک/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
مستوفی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
مشغول/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
مطرقه/z3b2y2j2j4t2
ملاک/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
منظرگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
منیسک/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
مونتبلو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1
نافچه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
نامردی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
ناپیدا/z2b3y4j1j3t1
نایی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
نختاب/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
نخفته/sn
نداشت/sg
نریان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
نشر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
نغزگو/z2b3y4j1j3t1
نفهمیده/sn
نماس/sh
نکنده/sn
نگرایید/sg
نگریست/e1e2e3e4sgzg
نیکل/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
هراساند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
همانجایی/z3b2y3j2j4t2
همراه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
وزانده/e1e2sn
پادو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1an
پاسگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
پالای/e1e2e3e4shzh
پایایی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
پایبند/z1b1y1j1j3t1
پایه/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3hz
پناه/e1e2e3e4shzh
پوش/e1e2e3e4shzh
چسباند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
چنبر/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
چهاردیواری/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
چولی/z3b2z5j2j4j6y3
کارتاژنا/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
کالانما/z2b3z4j1j3j5y1y4
کاندید/z1b1z4j1j3j5y1an
کایولین/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
کرست/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
کش/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
کشتارگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6y2
کماندو/z1b4z4j1j3j5y1an
کندهوش/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4t1t2
کوب/e1e2e3e4shzh
کوبان/e1e2e3e4shzh
کوهبان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
گت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
گرامیداشت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6y1an
گسار/e1e2e3e4shzh
گندید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
